Mississippi, session 2026, HB293.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, except as provided by subsection (2) of this section, a health care provider requesting that a medical laboratory test for a patient be performed shall not engage in information blocking as described in 42 USC Section 300jj-52. (2)  The following reports or test results and any other related results shall not be disclosed to a patient as part of the patient's electronic health record, or in the case of a clinical laboratory test result, or pathology report, shall not be disclosed by the person or entity that administers and controls the patient's electronic health record, until seventy-two (72) hours after the results are finalized, unless the patient's health care provider directs the release of the results before the end of that seventy-two-hour period: (a)  Pathology reports or radiology reports that have a reasonable likelihood of showing a finding of malignancy; or (b)  Tests that could reveal genetic markers. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.